Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1957.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1112.4 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A street-legal, low-speed electrical vehicle or golf cart
operated on the streets and highways of this state shall be
registered as a motor vehicle.
B. The operator of a street-legal, low-speed electrical vehicle
or golf cart shall not be required to have an "M" endorsement on the
Class D license pursuant to Section 6-110.1 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. The operator shall be at least sixteen (16)
years of age and hold a valid Oklahoma driver license.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1957 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 11-805.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 11-805.1. A. 1. No person shall operate any low-speed
electrical vehicle on any street or highway with a posted speed
limit greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour.
2. Any low-speed electrical vehicle or golf cart shall be in
compliance with the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration
standards for low-speed vehicles in 49 C.F.R., Section 571.500, to
be operated on the road.
B. 1. If a golf cart is to be operated on any street or
highway with a posted speed limit no greater than thirty-five (35)
miles per hour, the golf cart shall have a vehicle identification
number.
2. Upon inspection by Service Oklahoma, a golf cart may be
registered as a motor vehicle and licensed through Service Oklahoma
if such golf cart has been converted into a street-legal vehicle
meeting all requirements in 49 C.F.R., Section 571.500, with the
exception that such golf cart shall not be required to have a
seventeen-digit vehicle identification number.
3. Service Oklahoma is authorized to promulgate rules for the
purposes of this act.
C. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not
prohibit a low-speed vehicle from crossing a street or highway with
a posted speed limit greater than thirty-five (35) miles per hour.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1957 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. D. This section shall not prevent a city from adopting any
ordinance that would further restrict low-speed electrical vehicles
from operating on certain city-owned streets in order to ensure the
public health and safety.
D. E. This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the
rules of the road as provided in Section 11-101 et seq. of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AERONAUTICS AND TRANSPORTATION
April 14, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1957 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)